Washington statutes.
RCW 36.73.170

Completion of transportation improvement—Termination of district operations—Termination of taxes, fees, charges, and tolls—Dissolution of district.

Within thirty days of the completion of the construction of the transportation improvement or series of improvements authorized by a district, the district shall terminate day-to-day operations and exist solely as a limited entity that oversees the collection of revenue and the payment of debt service or financing still in effect, if any and to carry out the requirements of RCW 36.73.160. The district shall accordingly adjust downward its employees, administration, and overhead expenses. Any taxes, fees, charges, or tolls imposed by the district terminate when the financing or debt service on the transportation improvement or series of improvements constructed is completed and paid and notice is provided to the departments administering the taxes. Any excess revenues collected must be disbursed to the participating jurisdictions of the district in proportion to their population, using population estimates prepared by the office of financial management. The district shall dissolve itself and cease to exist thirty days after the financing or debt service on the transportation improvement, or series of improvements, constructed is completed and paid. If there is no debt outstanding, then the district shall dissolve within thirty days from completion of construction of the transportation improvement or series of improvements authorized by the district. Notice of dissolution must be published in newspapers of general circulation within the district at least three times in a period of thirty days. Creditors must file claims for payment of claims due within thirty days of the last published notice or the claim is extinguished.

[ 2005 c 336 s 19.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 336: See note following RCW 36.73.015.